Hawaii statutes.
[§261E-5] Staff. The air carrier
commission may appoint and employ, on a contractual or noncontractual basis not
subject to chapter 76, persons the commission determines necessary for the
performance of the commission's functions. The commission shall determine the
powers, duties, and compensation of the staff. [L Sp 2008, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next